District of Columbia statutes.
6-214

Social services teams in public housing.

(a)

The Authority may, subject to availability of funds, develop a plan for the provision of social services within the Housing Properties which it owns, operates, or manages, and establish social service teams to implement that plan.

(b)

Nothing in this section shall be construed to prohibit other District or United States government departments and agencies from providing social services to public housing residents.

History

May 9, 2000, D.C. Law 13-105, § 15, 47 DCR 1325

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90-day) addition of section, see notes following § 6-201.